Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.070

Application of chapter 6.27 RCW to prejudgment garnishments.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of chapter 6.27 RCW governing garnishments apply to prejudgment garnishments.

[ 1987 c 442 s 907.]